Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 3
FUNDING - STATE-ASSISTED PLANS

31-30.5-301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that the establishment of statewide actuarial standards regarding funded and unfunded liabilities of state-assisted old hire police officers' and firefighters' pension funds established pursuant to this article is a matter of statewide concern affected with a public interest, and the provisions of this part 3 are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state. The general assembly further declares that state moneys provided to municipalities, fire protection districts, and county improvement districts do not constitute an obligation of the state to participate in the costs of pension plan benefits but are provided in recognition that said local governments are currently burdened with financial obligations relating to pensions in excess of their present financial capacities. It is the intent of the general assembly in providing state moneys to assist said local governments that state participation decrease annually, terminating at the earliest possible date.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 867, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-802.

31-30.5-302. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission" means the pension review commission established pursuant to section 24-51.1-101.

"Employee" means any old hire firefighter, except any volunteer firefighter, or old hire police officer employed by an employer who is eligible for the benefits provided pursuant to this article.

"Employer" means any municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district employing one or more employees.

"Governing body" means the governing body of a municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district.

"State-assisted" means having received state moneys relating to accrued unfunded liability.

"Volunteer firefighter" has the same meaning as provided in section 31-30-1102 (9).

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 868, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2014:

(5) amended, (SB 14-031), ch. 52, p. 236, § 2, effective March 20.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-200), ch. 370, p. 2264, § 28, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-803.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-200, see section 1 of chapter 370, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

31-30.5-303. State assistance - limitation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 868, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (SB 14-031), ch. 52, p. 236, § 3, effective March 20.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-804.

31-30.5-304. Limitation on existing funds - procedures.

On and after January 1, 1982, every state-assisted old hire police officers' or firefighters' pension plan created pursuant to this article shall be financed in accordance with minimum funding standards prescribed in this part 3. Contributions made pursuant to this section include municipal, special district, and county improvement district contributions, the established employee contribution, and any state contribution.

Annual contributions to state-assisted old hire police officers' and firefighters' pension funds shall be made in at least the amount determined by the policy set by the board of the fire and police pension association that balances the following considerations: Stabilization of the amount of the annual required contributions over time; keeping the funded ratio of the pension fund from declining; and reducing or eliminating contributions as may be prudent based on actuarial experience. The unfunded accrued liabilities of the plan may be amortized over a period not to exceed the lesser of twenty years or the number of years equal to the average remaining life expectancy of the pension fund's members.

In addition to the contributions required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the employer shall annually pay any required dollar amount of contributions necessary to fund additional plan benefits adopted under section 31-30.5-210 (2), as established by supplemental actuarial studies on such funds.

and (3.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

All municipalities, fire protection districts, and county improvement districts, including both paid firefighters and volunteer firefighters in their pension plans, shall segregate the pension funds for paid firefighters and volunteer firefighters on an equitable basis for accounting and actuarial purposes, and said segregation shall be considered in all actuarial reports applicable to such funds. In computing the portion of the fund attributable to volunteer firefighters, the benefits of such volunteer firefighters shall not be reduced or otherwise changed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

Every employee employed as a firefighter or police officer for the first time after April 7, 1978, is covered by the benefit provisions set forth in or authorized by article 31 of this title.

Volunteer firefighters and volunteer firefighter pension funds are exempt from all provisions of this section except subsection (6) of this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

The board of any state-assisted old hire pension plan may take, by gift, grant, devise or bequest, any money, personal property, or real estate, or interest therein, as trustees for the uses and purposes for which the fund is created.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 868, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

(5)(a)(II) and (5)(b) amended, p. 1472, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 2006:

(3.5) amended, p. 181, § 5, effective March 31.

L. 2009:

(5)(a)(II) and (5)(b) amended, (SB 09-227), ch. 125, p. 540, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 2011:

(5)(a)(II) and (5)(b) amended, (SB 11-221), ch.152, p. 528, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-031), ch. 52, p. 237, § 4, effective March 20.

L. 2020:

(2)(a) amended and (4) and (11) repealed, (HB 20-1044), ch. 105, p. 404, § 1, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-805.

31-30.5-305. No change in employer obligation.

It is the intention of the general assembly that the minimum funding standards established by this part 3 shall not enlarge nor diminish the obligation of municipalities and fire protection districts to their employees for pension benefits provided pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 873, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-806.

31-30.5-306. Actuarial studies.

An actuarial study of each old hire police officers' and firefighters' pension fund administered by the association shall be conducted not later than July 1, 2014, and an updated actuarial study shall be conducted by the association every two years thereafter until the plan is terminated.

The association shall designate actuaries or firms of actuaries to supervise, conduct, or review actuarial studies required by this section.

The fire and police pension association's board of directors shall specify the actuarial assumptions to be used in each such actuarial study.

Costs of all such actuarial studies are an expense of the old hire plan and the fire and police pension association is authorized to pay for such costs as provided in section 31-31-302 (3).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 873, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2001:

(1)(b) amended, p. 302, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2003:

(1)(b)(II) amended, p. 1473, § 2, effective May 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(b)(II) amended, p. 181, § 6, effective March 31.

L. 2009:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (SB 09-227), ch. 125, p. 541, § 2, effective April 16.

L. 2011:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (SB 11-221), ch. 152, p. 529, § 2, effective May 5.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-031), ch. 52, p. 241, § 5, effective March 20.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1014.5.

31-30.5-307. State contribution.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

Each employer having rank escalation and having old hire members shall determine for each such employee the percentage that such employee's years served as of January 1, 1980, bear to the total number of years required for retirement. At retirement, the retirement pension shall be divided into that percentage and the remainder. The portion of the retirement pension equal to that percentage earned as of January 1, 1980, shall be subject to rank escalation as provided under the old hire pension plan, and the remainder of the retirement pension shall be subject to the same adjustment as that determined by the fire and police pension association board of directors pursuant to section 31-31-407.

An employer may elect to continue full rank escalation benefits for that portion of the retirement pension subject to the adjustment as provided in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), but no state contribution shall be used to fund such continuation of rank escalation or any unfunded liabilities incurred as a result of such continuation of rank escalation.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

Repealed.

Moneys transferred from the state treasurer as state assistance to the old hire plan members' benefit trust fund shall not revert to the general fund but are continuously available for the purposes provided in this part 3 and part 11 of article 30 of this title.

No other transfers for state assistance to the old hire plans shall be made to the old hire plan members' benefit trust fund pursuant to this section.

(2.5) Repealed.

to (6) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 874, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(1)(b)(I) amended, p. 826, § 43, effective August 5.

L. 99:

(2.5) added, p. 1269, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(2.5) repealed, p. 271, § 2, effective March 31.

L. 2001:

(1)(d) amended and (4) added, p. 302, § 2, effective August 8; (1)(d) repealed, p. 1180, § 18, effective August 8.

L. 2003:

(1)(a), (1)(c), (2), and (4) amended and (5) added, p. 1473, § 3, effective May 1.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1203, § 72, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(6) added, p. 756, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(2), (5)(a), (5)(b), and (6) amended, p. 181, § 7, effective March 31.

L. 2009:

(1)(a), (1)(c), (2), (4), (5)(a), and (5)(b) amended, (SB 09-227), ch. 125, p. 541, § 3, effective April 16.

L. 2011:

(1)(a), (1)(c), (2), (4), (5)(a)(II), and (5)(b) amended, (SB 11-221), ch. 152, p. 529, § 3, effective May 5.

L. 2013:

(2) and (3) amended, (SB 13-234), ch. 180, p. 663, § 1, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-031), ch. 52, p. 242, § 6, effective March 20.